Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-145
Loans; other improper solicitation or receipt of benefits; unlawful inducement; penalty.

Any stockholder or director, officer, agent, or employee of any bank who, for the use or benefit of himself or herself or any person other than the bank, solicits, asks for, or receives or agrees to receive from any person any gift or compensation or reward or inducement of any kind for (1) procuring or endeavoring to procure any loan from such bank to any person, (2) procuring or endeavoring to procure the purchase by such bank from any person of any negotiable or nonnegotiable instrument of any kind by discount or otherwise, (3) procuring or endeavoring to procure the purchase by such bank from any person of any real or personal property of any kind, or (4) procuring or endeavoring to procure such bank to permit any person to overdraw his or her account with such bank, is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1923, c. 191, § 40, p. 458;

C.S.1929, § 8-151;

R.S.1943, § 8-154;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 45, p. 152;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 48;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 42.